Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-726
Hunting; privately owned land; posting; apprehension of violator; arrest and prosecution.

Anyone who is apprehended by a conservation officer or other peace officer hunting upon the private property of another which has been legally posted as provided in section 37-724 shall be subject to arrest and prosecution without the signing of a complaint by the operator of the property.

Laws 1963, c. 199, § 4, p. 647;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-213.05;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 340;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 96.